Montana, session 2025, SB3.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 7-15-4234, MCA, is amended to read:
"7-15-4234. Urban renewal agency to be administered by appointed board of commissioners.
(1) If the urban renewal agency is authorized to transact business and exercise powers under this part, the
mayor, by and with the advice and consent of the local governing body, shall appoint a board of commissioners
of the urban renewal agency consisting of no fewer than five commissioners, including one representative from
the county or consolidated city-county government and one representative from a school district with
boundaries that overlap with the urban renewal area.
(2) The initial membership shall must consist, at a minimum, of one commissioner appointed for 1
year, one for 2 years, one for 3 years, and two for 4 years. Each subsequent appointment must be for 4 years.
A certificate of the appointment or reappointment of a commissioner must be filed with the clerk of the
municipality, and the certificate is conclusive evidence of the proper appointment of the commissioner.
(3) Each commissioner shall hold office until a successor has been appointed and has qualified.
(4) A commissioner may not receive compensation for services but is entitled to the necessary
expenses, including traveling expenses, incurred in the discharge of duties.
(5) Any persons may be appointed as commissioners if they reside within the municipality.
(6) A commissioner may be removed for inefficiency, neglect of duty, or misconduct in office."
Section 2. Section 7-15-4282, MCA, is amended to read:
"7-15-4282. Authorization for tax increment financing -- advisory committee. (1) An urban
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 3
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB0003
renewal plan as defined in 7-15-4206 or a targeted economic development district comprehensive development
plan created as provided in 7-15-4279 may contain a provision or be amended to contain a tax increment
provision as provided in 7-15-4282 through 7-15-4294. The local governing body shall approve the adoption of
a tax increment provision included in an urban renewal plan. The legislative body of a local government shall
approve the adoption of a tax increment provision included in a targeted economic development district
comprehensive development plan.
(2) (a) Before adopting a tax increment financing provision as part of an urban renewal plan or a
comprehensive development plan, a municipality shall provide notice to the county and the school district in
which the urban renewal district or targeted economic development district is located and provide the county
and school district with the opportunity to meet and consult in a public meeting with the opportunity for public
comment regarding the proposed tax increment financing provision and its effect on the county or school
district.
(b) Before adopting a tax increment financing provision as part of a comprehensive development
plan, a county shall provide notice to the school district in which the targeted economic development district is
located and provide the school district with the opportunity to meet and consult in a public meeting with the
opportunity for public comment regarding the proposed tax increment financing provision and its effect on the
school district.
(3) The tax increment financing provision must take into account the effect on the county and
school districts that include local government territory.
(4) (a) Except as provided in subsection (4)(b), the legislative body of a local government that
adopts a tax increment financing provision shall appoint an advisory committee to advise the local government
about the administration of the urban renewal area or targeted economic development district. The committee
must include at least one representative from each incorporated city or town, county, or school district with
boundaries that overlap with the urban renewal area or targeted economic development district. The committee
may include representatives of other taxing bodies with boundaries that overlap with the urban renewal area or
targeted economic development district.
(b) An urban renewal area administered by an urban renewal agency created under 7-15-4232(2)
is not required to appoint an advisory committee as provided in subsection (4)(a)."
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 3
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB0003
Section 3. Transition. If the urban renewal agency provided for in 7-15-4234 is composed of five
commissioners on [the effective date of this act], in the event of a vacancy or on the next appointment the
mayor, by and with the advice and consent of the local governing body, shall appoint commissioners consisting
of one representative from the county or consolidated city-county followed by one representative from a school
district with boundaries that overlap with the urban renewal area.
- END -
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – SB 3
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
SB 3, originated in the Senate.
___________________________________________
Secretary of the Senate
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

SENATE BILL NO. 3
INTRODUCED BY J. TREBAS
BY REQUEST OF THE REVENUE INTERIM COMMITTEE
AN ACT REQUIRING A DISTRICT THAT USES TAX INCREMENT FINANCING TO CREATE AN ADVISORY
COMMITTEE; AND AMENDING SECTION SECTIONS 7-15-4234 AND 7-15-4282, MCA.”